Utah statutes.
65A-8-211.   Closed fire season -- Notice -- Violations -- Burning permits
-- Personal liability -- Exemptions from burning permits.
(1) (a)  The period from June 1 to October 31 of each year is a closed fire
season throughout the state.
(b)  The state forester may advance or extend the closed season wherever and
whenever that action is necessary.
(c)  The alteration of the closed season is done by posting the appropriate
proclamation in the courthouse of each county seat for at least seven days in
advance of the date the change is effective.
(2)  During the closed season it is a class B misdemeanor to set on fire, or
cause to be set on fire, any flammable material on any forest, brush, range,
grass, grain, stubble, or hay land without:
(a)  first securing a written permit from the state forester or a designated
deputy; and
(b)  complying fully with the terms and conditions prescribed by the permit.
(3) The district fire warden appointed by the state forester or the county
sheriff in nonparticipating counties shall issue burning permits using the
form prescribed by the division.
(4) (a)  The burning permit does not relieve an individual from personal
liability due to neglect or incompetence.
(b) A fire escaping control of the permittee that necessitates fire control
action or does injury to the property of another is prima facie evidence that
the fire was not safe.
(5)  The state forester, his deputies, and the county sheriffs may refuse,
revoke, postpone, or cancel permits when they find it necessary in the
interest of public safety.
(6) (a)  A burning permit is not required for the burning of fence lines on
cultivated lands, canals, or irrigation ditches if:
(i)  the burning does not pose a threat to forest, range, or watershed lands;
(ii)  due care is used in the control of the burning; and
(iii)  the individual notifies the nearest fire department of the approximate
time the burning will occur.
(b)  Failure to notify the nearest fire department of the burning as required
by this section is a class B misdemeanor.
(7)  A burning conducted in accordance with Subsection (6) is not a reckless
burning under Section 76-6-104 unless the fire escapes control and requires
fire control action.
